Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.650

School resource officer training—Materials—Grant program—Report.

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, by January 1, 2020, the state school safety center, established in RCW 28A.300.630, in collaboration with the school safety and student well-being advisory committee, established in RCW 28A.300.635, and law enforcement entities interested in providing training to school resource officers, shall identify and make publicly available training materials that are consistent with the requirements in RCW 28A.320.124.

(2)(a) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must establish and implement a grant program to fund training for school resource officers as described in RCW 28A.320.124. Eligible grantees include school districts, educational service districts, law enforcement agencies, and law enforcement training organizations. Training under this section may be developed by schools in partnership with local law enforcement and organizations that have expertise in topics such as juvenile brain development; restorative practices or restorative justice; social-emotional learning; civil rights; and student rights, including free speech and search and seizure. This training may be provided by the criminal justice training commission.

(b) By December 1st of each year the program is funded, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must submit an annual report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature on the program.

[ 2019 c 333 s 13.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 333: See note following RCW 28A.300.630.

Intent—2019 c 333: See note following RCW 28A.320.124.